Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE K. SPECIALTY COURTS

CHAPTER 130. JUVENILE FAMILY DRUG COURT PROGRAM

Sec. 130.001. JUVENILE FAMILY DRUG COURT PROGRAM DEFINED. In this chapter, "juvenile family drug court program" means a program that has the following essential characteristics:

(1) the integration of substance abuse treatment services in the processing of cases and proceedings under Title 3, Family Code;

(2) the use of a comprehensive case management approach involving court-appointed case managers and court-appointed special advocates to rehabilitate an individual who is suspected of substance abuse and who resides with a child who is the subject of a case filed under Title 3, Family Code;

(3) early identification and prompt placement of eligible individuals who volunteer to participate in the program;

(4) comprehensive substance abuse needs assessment and referrals to appropriate substance abuse treatment agencies for participants;

(5) a progressive treatment approach with specific requirements for participants to meet for successful completion of the program;

(6) monitoring of abstinence through periodic screening for alcohol or screening for controlled substances;

(7) ongoing judicial interaction with program participants;

(8) monitoring and evaluation of program goals and effectiveness;

(9) continuing interdisciplinary education for the promotion of effective program planning, implementation, and operation; and

(10) development of partnerships with public agencies and community organizations.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 135 (H.B. 454), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 130.002. AUTHORITY TO ESTABLISH PROGRAM. The commissioners court of a county may establish a juvenile family drug court program for individuals who:

(1) are suspected by the Department of Family and Protective Services or the court of having a substance abuse problem; and

(2) reside in the home of a child who is the subject of a case filed under Title 3, Family Code.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 135 (H.B. 454), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 130.003. PARTICIPANT PAYMENT FOR TREATMENT AND SERVICES. A juvenile family drug court program may require a participant to pay the cost of all treatment and services received while participating in the program, based on the participant's ability to pay.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 135 (H.B. 454), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 130.004. FUNDING. A county that creates a juvenile family drug court under this chapter shall explore the possibility of using court improvement project money to finance the juvenile family drug court in the county. The county also shall explore the availability of federal and state matching money to finance the court.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 135 (H.B. 454), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.